Washington statutes.
RCW 19.144.080

Unlawful actions—Fraud, misrepresentation, deceptive practices.

(1) It is unlawful for any person in connection with the mortgage lending process to directly or indirectly:

(a)(i) Employ any scheme, device, or artifice to defraud or materially mislead any borrower during the lending process; (ii) defraud or materially mislead any lender, defraud or materially mislead any person, or engage in any unfair or deceptive practice toward any person related to the mortgage lending process; or (iii) obtain property by fraud or material misrepresentation during the mortgage lending process;

(b) Knowingly make any misstatement, misrepresentation, or omission related to the mortgage lending process knowing that it may be relied on by a mortgage lender, borrower, or any other party related to the mortgage lending process;

(c) Use or facilitate the use of any misstatement, misrepresentation, or omission, knowing the same to contain a misstatement, misrepresentation, or omission, related to the mortgage lending process with the intention that it be relied on by a mortgage lender, borrower, or any other party related to the mortgage lending process;

(d) Receive any proceeds or anything of value in connection with a residential mortgage closing that such person knew resulted from a violation of subsection (1), (2), or (3) of this section [(a), (b), or (c) of this subsection];

(e) File or cause to be filed with the county recorder or the official registrar of deeds of any county of this state any document such person knows to contain a material misstatement, misrepresentation, or omission;

(f) Violate RCW 31.04.297(3); or

(g) Knowingly alter, destroy, shred, mutilate, or conceal a record, document, or other object, or attempt to do so, with the intent to impair the investigation and prosecution of this crime.

(2) Each crime prosecuted under this section shall be punished separately under chapter 9.94A RCW, unless it is the same criminal conduct as any other crime under RCW 9.94A.589.

(3) Every person who, in the commission of mortgage fraud as described in this section, commits any other crime may be punished for that other crime in addition to mortgage fraud, and may be prosecuted for each crime separately.

[ 2015 c 229 s 3; 2010 c 35 s 12; 2008 c 108 s 9.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2010 c 35: See RCW 31.04.904.